Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2166
Recovery of damages; effect upon right of action.

A recovery of damages by virtue of this chapter, against a party, who shall have made a return to a writ of mandamus, is a bar to any other action against the same party for the making of such return.

R.S.1867, Code § 655, p. 509;

R.S.1913, § 8281;

C.S.1922, § 9234;

C.S.1929, § 20-2166;

R.S.1943, § 25-2166.